Mississippi, session 2026, HB1273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 77-7-88, Mississippi Code of 1972: 77-7-88. Each owner or operator of a motor vehicle having a gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) or gross combination weight rating (GCWR) of more than ten thousand (10,000) pounds which is operated upon the public highways of this state for the transportation of property, and which is not otherwise required to file proof of financial responsibility under this chapter, shall keep on file with the commission an insurance policy or a certificate of insurance in lieu thereof, issued by some insurance company or association or other insurer authorized to transact business in this state, or bond or bonds, to be approved by the commission, conditioned to pay any final judgment against the owner or operator for personal injuries or property damage resulting from or arising out of the use, maintenance or operation of the motor vehicle, and suffered by a member of the public or by the state or any of its political subdivisions.  The minimum amount of the insurance policy or bond required under this section shall be as provided in 49 CFR part 387. SECTION 2.  Section 77-7-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-7-7. Whenever used in this chapter unless expressly stated otherwise: (a) The term "person" means individual, firm, copartnership, corporation, company, association or joint-stock association, and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee or personal representative thereof. (b) The term "commission" means the Mississippi Transportation Commission. (c) The term "highway" means every public highway or place of whatever nature open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicle travel in this state, including the streets and alleys in towns and cities. (d) The term "motor vehicle" and "vehicle" means any vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer or semitrailer propelled or drawn by mechanical power and used upon the highways in the transportation of passengers or property; such term, however, does not include any vehicle, locomotive or car operated exclusively on a rail or rails. (e) The term "common carrier by motor vehicle" means any person who or which undertakes, whether directly or by a lease or any other arrangement, to transport passengers or household goods. (f) The term "contract carrier by motor vehicle" means any person, not included under paragraph (e) of this section, who or which, under special and individual contracts or agreements, and whether directly or by a lease or any other arrangement, transports passengers or household goods. (g) The term "restricted motor carrier" means all carriers of property, except household goods, by motor vehicle for compensation. (h) The "services" and "transportation" to which this chapter applies include all vehicles operated by, for or in the interest of any motor carrier irrespective of ownership or contract, express or implied, together with all facilities and property operated or controlled by any such carrier or carriers and used in the transportation of passengers or property or in the performance of any service in connection therewith. (i) The term "certificate" means a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the commission to common carriers by motor vehicle and restricted common carriers by motor vehicle under this chapter. (j) The term "permit" means a permit issued by the commission to contract carriers by motor vehicle under this chapter. (k) The term "interstate permit" means a permit issued under the terms of this chapter to the holder of a certificate of public convenience and necessity, a permit, or other operating authority from the U.S. Department of Transportation. (l) The term "owner" or "operator" and "owner and operator" means any individual, firm, copartnership, corporation, company, association or joint-stock association, and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee or personal representative thereof, to whom or to which a certificate of convenience and necessity or permit or interstate permit has been issued by the commission. (m) The term "vanpooling" means a nonprofit arrangement entered into to provide for the transportation of persons to and from their places of employment utilizing a motor vehicle manufactured primarily for the transporting of not less than eight (8) nor more than fifteen (15) people, and where the costs of operating said vehicle, including reasonable vehicle depreciation costs, are paid for by those people utilizing such arrangement. (n) The term "gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR)" means the value specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of a single motor vehicle. (o) The term "gross combination weight rating (GCWR)" means the value specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of a combination (articulated) motor vehicle.  In the absence of a value specified by the manufacturer, GCWR will be determined by adding the GVWR of the power unit and the total weight of the towed unit and any load thereon. (p) The term "department" means the Department of Public Safety. (q) The term "division" means the Commercial Transportation Enforcement Division within the department. SECTION 3.  Section 77-7-83, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-7-83. Each holder of a certificate authorizing operation as a common carrier by motor vehicle, or the holder of a contract permit issued by the commission, shall keep in force at all times an insurance policy or a certificate of insurance in lieu thereof, issued by some insurance company or association or other insurer authorized to transact business in this state, or bond or bonds, to be approved by the commission, in an amount required by the commission, conditioned to pay any final judgment against the carrier for personal injuries or property damage resulting from or arising out of the use, maintenance or operation of the motor vehicles of such carrier and suffered by any member of the public or by the state or any of its political subdivisions.  The amount of the insurance policy or bond required by the commission under this section shall in no case be less than the insurance requirements of the United States Department of Transportation as set out in 49 CFR part 387. SECTION 4.  Section 77-7-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-7-85. Each holder of a permit as a contract carrier by motor vehicle issued by the commission shall keep on file with the commission an insurance policy or a certificate of insurance in lieu thereof, issued by some insurance company or association or other insurer authorized to transact business in this state, or bond or bonds, to be approved by the commission, conditioned to pay any final judgment against said contract carrier for personal injuries or property damage resulting from or arising out of the use, maintenance or operation of the motor vehicles of such carrier, and suffered by any member of the public or by the state or any of its political subdivisions.  However, such carrier shall not be required to file a policy of insurance or bond conditioned to pay the judgments on claims of its passengers, or shippers or patrons.  The minimum amount of such insurance policy or bond shall be as provided in Section 77-7-83. SECTION 5.  Section 77-7-87, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-7-87. Each motor carrier holding certificates or permits from and operating under the authority of the Interstate Commerce Commission, in interstate business only, shall file and keep on file with the commission a policy or certificate of insurance, bond or certification of qualification as a self-insurer which complies with the Interstate Commerce Commission's requirements for the single state insurance registration program, conditioned to pay any final judgment against such interstate carrier for personal injury or property damage resulting from or arising out of the use, maintenance or operation of the motor vehicles of such interstate carrier, and suffered by any member of the public, or by the state or any of its subdivisions.  However, no interstate carrier shall be required to file insurance or bond conditioned to pay the judgments on claims of its passengers, shippers, or patrons.  The minimum amount of the insurance policy, certificate or bond shall be as provided in 49 CFR part 387. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.